dev/saldo/saldo.nouns.dix
    <pardef n="q__n_nt">
      <e><p>          <l>q</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>:et</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>-et</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>:t</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>-t</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>:na</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>-na</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>-n</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>:n</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="anmäl/an__n_ut">
      <e><p>          <l>ningarna</l><r>an<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>an</l><r>an<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>an</l><r>an<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ningar</l><r>an<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="kammarkollegi/um__n_nt">
      <e><p>          <l>um</l><r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>et</l><r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>um</l><r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="bitum/en__n_nt">
      <e><p>          <l>en</l><r>en<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>inet</l><r>en<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>en</l><r>en<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ab/er__n_nt">
      <e><p>          <l>er</l><r>er<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ren</l><r>er<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>eren</l><r>er<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>er</l><r>er<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ret</l><r>er<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>er</l><r>er<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>eret</l><r>er<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pris__n_nt">
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="Ø__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>et</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>en</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>erna</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="Ø__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>er</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="frö__n_nt">
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>et</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>t</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>en</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>erna</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>na</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>n</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>er</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="tevatt/en__n_nt">
      <e><p>          <l>en</l><r>en<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>net</l><r>en<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="kof/ot__n_ut">
      <e><p>          <l>oten</l><r>ot<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ot</l><r>ot<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>otarna</l><r>ot<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ötterna</l><r>ot<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ötter</l><r>ot<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>otar</l><r>ot<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="x__n_nt">
      <e><p>          <l>x</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>-et</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>:et</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>et</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>en</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>-en</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>:en</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>x</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ör/a__n_nt">
      <e><p>          <l>on</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>onen</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>a</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>at</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="l/and__n_nt">
      <e><p>          <l>and</l><r>and<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>andet</l><r>and<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>and</l><r>and<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>änder</l><r>and<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>anden</l><r>and<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>änderna</l><r>and<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="getfot"><i>getf</i><par n="kof/ot__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="bokanmälan"><i>bokanmäl</i><par n="anmäl/an__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="förhinder"><i>förhind</i><par n="ab/er__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="fredspris"><i>fredspris</i><par n="pris__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="kalkvatten"><i>kalkvatt</i><par n="tevatt/en__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="snålvatten"><i>snålvatt</i><par n="tevatt/en__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="öra"><i>ör</i><par n="ör/a__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="nissöga"><i>nissög</i><par n="ör/a__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="fabrikspris"><i>fabrikspris</i><par n="pris__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="etui"><i>etui</i><par n="frö__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="överpris"><i>överpris</i><par n="pris__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="blodvatten"><i>blodvatt</i><par n="tevatt/en__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="konsumentpris"><i>konsumentpris</i><par n="pris__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="emaljöga"><i>emaljög</i><par n="ör/a__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="missnöjesanmälan"><i>missnöjesanmäl</i><par n="anmäl/an__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="mässingsvatten"><i>mässingsvatt</i><par n="tevatt/en__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="koöga"><i>koög</i><par n="ör/a__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="frö"><i>frö</i><par n="frö__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="tofsöra"><i>tofsör</i><par n="ör/a__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="tevatten"><i>tevatt</i><par n="tevatt/en__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="hundöra"><i>hundör</i><par n="ör/a__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="framställan"><i>framställ</i><par n="anmäl/an__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="kofot"><i>kof</i><par n="kof/ot__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="fastighetspris"><i>fastighetspris</i><par n="pris__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="q"><i>q</i><par n="q__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="underpris"><i>underpris</i><par n="pris__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="bitumen"><i>bitum</i><par n="bitum/en__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="slagvatten"><i>slagvatt</i><par n="tevatt/en__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="oxöga"><i>oxög</i><par n="ör/a__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="mellanöra"><i>mellanör</i><par n="ör/a__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="inneröra"><i>innerör</i><par n="ör/a__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="aber"><i>ab</i><par n="ab/er__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="rampris"><i>rampris</i><par n="pris__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="land"><i>l</i><par n="l/and__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="dopvatten"><i>dopvatt</i><par n="tevatt/en__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="stoppris"><i>stoppris</i><par n="pris__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="kristallvatten"><i>kristallvatt</i><par n="tevatt/en__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="vänsteröga"><i>vänsterög</i><par n="ör/a__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="brackvatten"><i>brackvatt</i><par n="tevatt/en__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="teateranmälan"><i>teateranmäl</i><par n="anmäl/an__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="bopris"><i>bopris</i><par n="pris__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="paternoster"><i>paternost</i><par n="ab/er__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="nettopris"><i>nettopris</i><par n="pris__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="litteraturanmälan"><i>litteraturanmäl</i><par n="anmäl/an__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="villapris"><i>villapris</i><par n="pris__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="blyvatten"><i>blyvatt</i><par n="tevatt/en__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="seltersvatten"><i>seltersvatt</i><par n="tevatt/en__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="giftverkan"><i>giftverk</i><par n="anmäl/an__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="rosenvatten"><i>rosenvatt</i><par n="tevatt/en__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="vingöra"><i>vingör</i><par n="ör/a__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="anmälan"><i>anmäl</i><par n="anmäl/an__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="x"><i>x</i><par n="x__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="gödselvatten"><i>gödselvatt</i><par n="tevatt/en__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="reapris"><i>reapris</i><par n="pris__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="nejonöga"><i>nejonög</i><par n="ör/a__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="nålsöga"><i>nålsög</i><par n="ör/a__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="tävlingspris"><i>tävlingspris</i><par n="pris__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="rapsfrö"><i>rapsfrö</i><par n="frö__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="dådrafrö"><i>dådrafrö</i><par n="frö__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="stenfot"><i>stenf</i><par n="kof/ot__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="skönhetspris"><i>skönhetspris</i><par n="pris__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="fälttävlan"><i>fälttävl</i><par n="anmäl/an__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="fasettöga"><i>fasettög</i><par n="ör/a__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="vigvatten"><i>vigvatt</i><par n="tevatt/en__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="kammarkollegium"><i>kammarkollegi</i><par n="kammarkollegi/um__n_nt"/></e>
